Washington statutes.
RCW 38.40.230

Purple heart state—Signage—Account.

(1) Any state agency operating pursuant to this title is authorized to erect signs recognizing that Washington state is a purple heart state as designated in RCW 1.20.190. State agencies are authorized to accept gifts or donations to assist efforts related to Washington state being a purple heart state.

(2) The military department purple heart state account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from gifts and donations received pursuant to this section must be deposited into the account. Expenditures from the account may only be used to erect signs or other activities that assist efforts related to Washington state being a purple heart state, as authorized under this section. Only the director of the military department or the director's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

[ 2021 c 213 s 3.]

NOTES:

Findings—2021 c 213: See note following RCW 1.20.190.